Utah statutes.
48-2e-116.   Dual capacity.

A person may be both a general partner and a limited partner.  A person that is both a general and limited partner has the rights, powers, duties, and obligations provided by this chapter and the partnership agreement in each of those capacities.  When the person acts as a general partner, the person is subject to the obligations, duties, and restrictions under this chapter and the partnership agreement for general partners.  When the person acts as a limited partner, the person is subject to the obligations, duties, and restrictions under this chapter and the partnership agreement for limited partners.



Enacted by Chapter 412, 2013 General Session

